Massachusetts, session 194th, S2076.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Mass General Laws Chapter 62 section 6 is hereby amended by adding at the end the 
following paragraph:- 
(aa)(1) A credit shall be allowed against all taxes paid by an employer for not more than 
30 percent of eligible expenses for the purpose of employee recruitment and retention.  
(2) Eligible expenses for said credit shall include expenditures made on behalf of, or 
reimbursement made to, an eligible employee, for education or skills training, transportation, 
housing, tools, or equipment.  
(3) The total amount of the credit shall not exceed fifty million dollars, provided that no 
single employer may claim the credit for expenses related to more than 3 employees.  

of 2 10  (4) In claiming the credit, an employer shall certify that an employee has, or will, remain 
employed in their current position for not less than twenty-four months, provided that if such 
employee is not so employed the employer shall forfeit the credit and reimburse the 
commonwealth for the amount of any credit attributable to that employee.  
(5) The provisions of this section shall expire five years following their adoption, unless 
otherwise terminated, modified, or extended.